California statutes. Public Utilities Code
 commission, or of any operating permit or certificate issued to any charter-party carrier of passengers, or who procures, aids, or abets any charter-party carrier of passengers in its failure to obey, observe, or comply with any such order, decision, rule, regulation, direction, demand, requirement, or operating permit, or certificate, is subject to a penalty of not more than two thousand dollars ($2,000) for each offense.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 263, Sec. 7.   (AB 951)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

5413.5.

(a) Whenever the commission, after hearing, finds that any person or corporation is operating as a charter-party carrier of passengers, including a charter-party carrier operating a limousine, without a valid certificate or permit, or fails to include in any written or oral advertisement the number of the certificate or permit required by Section 5386, the commission may impose a fine of not more than seven
 thousand five hundred dollars ($7,500) for each violation. The commission may assess the person or corporation an amount sufficient to cover the reasonable expense of investigation incurred by the commission. The commission may assess interest on any fine or assessment imposed, to commence on the day the payment of the fine or assessment becomes delinquent. All fines, assessments, and interest collected shall be deposited at least once each month in the General Fund.

(b) Whenever the commission, after hearing, finds that any person or corporation is operating a charter-party carrier of passengers as a taxicab without a valid certificate or permit in violation of an ordinance or resolution of a city, county, or city and county, the commission may impose a fine of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) for each violation. The commission may assess the person or corporation an amount sufficient to cover the reasonable expense of
 investigation incurred by the commission. The commission may assess interest on any fine or assessment imposed, to commence on the day the payment of the fine or assessment becomes delinquent. All fines, assessments, and interest collected shall be deposited at least once each month in the General Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 263, Sec. 8.   (AB 951)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

5414.

Every corporation or person other than a charter-party carrier of passengers who knowingly and willfully, either individually, or acting as an officer, agent, or employee of a corporation, copartnership, or any other person other than a charter-party carrier of passengers, violates any provision of this chapter or fails to observe, obey, or comply with any order, decision, rule, regulation, direction, demand, or requirement of the
 commission, or who procures, aids, or abets any charter-party carrier of passengers in its violation of this chapter, or in its failure to obey, observe, or comply with any such order, decision, rule, regulation, direction, demand, or requirement, is subject to a penalty of not more than two thousand dollars ($2,000) for each offense.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 263, Sec. 9.   (AB 951)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

5414.5.

Every corporation or person who knowingly and willfully issues, publishes, or affixes, or causes or permits the issuance, publishing, or affixing, of any oral or written advertisement, broadcast, or other holding out to the public, or any portion thereof, that the corporation or person is in operation as a charter-party carrier of passengers without having a valid certificate or permit issued under this chapter is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable, if an individual, by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than six months, or by both, or, if a corporation, by a
 fine of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000).

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 806, Sec. 3.   Effective September 19, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

5415.

Every violation of the provisions of this chapter or of any order, decision, decree, rule, direction, demand, or requirement of the commission by any corporation or person is a separate and distinct offense, and in case of a continuing violation each day’s continuance thereof is a separate and distinct offense.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 2146.)
-------------------------------------------

5415.5.

When the executive director of the commission determines that any charter-party carrier of passengers, or any officer, director, or agent of any charter-party carrier of passengers, has engaged in, is engaged in, or is about to engage in, any acts or practices in violation of this chapter, or any order, decision, rule, regulation, direction, demand, or requirement issued under this chapter, the executive director may make application to the superior court for an order enjoining those acts or practices or for an order directing compliance. The court may grant a permanent or temporary injunction, restraining order, or other order, including, but not limited to, an order allowing vehicles used for subsequent operations subject to the order to be impounded at the carrier’s expense and subject to release only
 by subsequent court order following a petition to the court by the defendant or owner of the vehicle, upon a showing by the executive director that a person or corporation has engaged in or is about to engage in these acts or practices. The commission may contract with the Department of the California Highway Patrol or a sheriff to assist in enforcement of an order for vehicle impound. Any costs incurred by the commission for that assistance are not assignable to the carrier as an expense of impound.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 797, Sec. 2.   (SB 1474)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

5416.

All penalties accruing under this chapter are cumulative, and a suit for the recovery of one penalty does not bar or affect the recovery of any other penalty or forfeiture or bar any criminal prosecution against any person or corporation, or any officer, director, agent of employee thereof, or any other corporation or person, or bar the exercise by the commission of its power to punish for contempt.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 2146.)
-------------------------------------------

5417.

(a) Actions to recover penalties under this chapter shall be brought in the name of the people of the State of California, in the superior court of the county, or city and
 county, in which the cause or some part thereof arose, or in which the corporation complained of, if any, has its principal place of business, or in which the person, if any, complained of, resides. The action shall be commenced and prosecuted to final judgment by the attorney of the commission.

(b) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2014.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 13) and added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 552, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2009.   Section operative January 1, 2014, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

5417.5.

(a) The commission shall ensure that this chapter is enforced and obeyed, and that violations thereof are promptly prosecuted and that penalty moneys due to the state are recovered and collected, and to this end it may sue in the name of the people of the State of California. Upon the request of the commission, the Attorney General or the district attorney of the proper county or city and county may aid in any investigation, hearing, or trial under this chapter. The Attorney General, a district attorney of the proper county or city and county, or a city attorney may institute and prosecute actions or proceedings for the violation of any law committed in connection with, or arising from, a transaction involving a charter-party
 carrier of passengers.

(b) For purposes of this section, “peace officer” means a person designated as a peace officer pursuant to Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 830) of Title 3 of Part 2 of the Penal Code.

(c) A peace officer may enforce and assist in the enforcement of Sections 5411 and 5412 resulting from a violation of Section 5371, 5379, 5385, 5385.7, or 5387, or more than one of those sections. A peace officer may additionally enforce and assist in the enforcement of Sections 5411.3 and 5414.5. In any case in which an arrest authorized by this subdivision is made for an offense declared to be a misdemeanor, and the person arrested does not demand to be taken before a magistrate, the arresting peace officer may, instead of taking such person before a magistrate, follow
 the procedure prescribed by Chapter 5C (commencing with Section 853.5) of Title 3 of Part 2 of the Penal Code. The provisions of that chapter shall thereafter apply with reference to any proceeding based upon the issuance of a citation pursuant to this authority.

(d) The commission shall coordinate enforcement of this section with those peace officers likely to be involved in enforcing this section, including undertaking both of the following:

(1) Educational outreach to promote awareness among those peace officers about the requirements of Sections 5371, 5379, 5385, 5385.7, 5387, 5411, 5411.3, 5412, and 5414.5.

(2) Establishing lines of communication so that the commission is notified if an action is commenced
 to enforce the requirements of those sections specified in subdivision (c), so that the commission may take appropriate action to enforce the fine and penalty provisions of this article.

(e) The Attorney General, a district attorney of the proper county or city and county, or a city attorney may institute and prosecute actions or proceedings for the violation of any law committed in connection with, or arising from, a transaction involving the transportation of passengers by a charter-party carrier of passengers.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 718, Sec. 10.   (SB 541)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

5418.

In any such action, all penalties incurred up to the time of the commencement of the action may be sued for and recovered. In all such actions, the procedure and rules of evidence shall be the same as in ordinary civil actions.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 2146.)
-------------------------------------------

5419.

All penalties recovered by the State in any action pursuant to this chapter, together with the costs thereof, shall be paid into the State Treasury to the credit of the General Fund. Any such action may be compromised or discontinued on application of the commission upon such terms as the court approves and orders.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 2146.)
-------------------------------------------

5420.

Whenever a written notice to appear has been mailed to the owner of a charter-party carrier of passengers motor vehicle, an exact and legible duplicate copy of the notice, when filed with the magistrate in lieu of a verified complaint, is a complaint to which the defendant may plead guilty.

If, however, the defendant fails to appear, does not deposit bail, or pleads other than guilty to the offense charged, a complaint shall be filed which conforms to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 948) of Title 5 of Part 2 of the Penal Code and which shall be deemed to be an original complaint, and thereafter the proceeding
 shall be held as provided by law, except that the defendant may, by an agreement in writing, subscribed by the defendant and filed with the court, waive the filing of a verified complaint and elect that the prosecution may proceed upon a written notice to appear.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1093, Sec. 13.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Transportation Network Companies [5430. - 5450.]

5430.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, this article shall apply to transportation network companies.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 389, Sec. 1.   (AB 2293)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

5431.

For purposes of this article, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Participating driver” or “driver” means any person who uses a vehicle in connection with a transportation network company’s online-enabled application or platform to connect with passengers.

(b) “Personal vehicle” means a vehicle that is used by a participating driver to provide prearranged transportation services for compensation that meets all of the following requirements:

(1) Has a passenger capacity of eight persons or less, including the driver.

(2) Is owned, leased, rented for a term that does not exceed 30
 days, or otherwise authorized for use by the participating driver.

(3) Meets all inspection and other safety requirements imposed by the commission.

(4) Is not a taxicab or limousine.

(c) “Transportation network company” means an organization, including, but not limited to, a corporation, limited liability company, partnership, sole proprietor, or any other entity, operating in California that provides prearranged transportation services for compensation using an online-enabled application or platform to connect passengers with drivers using a personal vehicle.

(d) “Transportation network company insurance” means a liability insurance policy that specifically covers liabilities arising from a driver’s use of a vehicle in connection with a transportation
 network company’s online-enabled application or platform.

(e) “Zero-emission vehicle” has the same meaning as in Section 44258 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 369, Sec. 3.   (SB 1014)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

5431.5.

In addition to the definitions provided in Section 5431, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Access provider” means an organization or entity that directly provides, or contracts with a separate organization or entity to provide, on-demand transportation to meet the needs of persons with disabilities.

(b) “Wheelchair accessible vehicle” or “WAV” means a vehicle
 equipped with a ramp or lift capable of transporting nonfolding motorized wheelchairs, mobility scooters, or other mobility devices.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 701, Sec. 2.   (SB 1376)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

5432.

(a) A transportation network company shall disclose in writing to participating drivers, as part of its agreement with those drivers, the insurance coverage and limits of liability that the transportation network company provides while the driver uses a vehicle in connection with a transportation network company’s online-enabled application or platform, and shall advise a participating driver in writing that the driver’s personal automobile insurance policy will not
 provide coverage because the driver uses a vehicle in connection with a transportation network company’s online-enabled application or platform.

(b) A transportation network company shall also disclose in writing to participating drivers, as part of its agreement with those drivers, that the driver’s personal automobile insurance policy will not provide collision or comprehensive coverage for damage to the vehicle used by the driver from the moment the driver logs on to the transportation network company’s online-enabled application or platform to the moment the driver logs off the transportation network company’s online-enabled application or platform.

(c) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2015.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 389, Sec. 1.   (AB 2293)   Effective January 1, 2015.   Section operative July 1, 2015, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

5433.

(a) A transportation network company and any participating driver shall maintain transportation network company insurance as provided in this section.

(b) The following requirements shall apply to transportation network company insurance from the moment a participating driver accepts a ride request on the transportation network company’s online-enabled application or platform until the driver completes the transaction on the online-enabled application or platform or until the ride is complete, whichever is later:

(1) Transportation network company insurance shall be primary and in the amount of one million dollars ($1,000,000) for death, personal injury, and property damage. The requirements for the
 coverage required by this paragraph may be satisfied by any of the following:

(A) Transportation network company insurance maintained by a participating driver.

(B) Transportation network company insurance maintained by a transportation network company.

(C) Any combination of subparagraphs (A) and (B).

(2) A transportation network company shall provide uninsured motorist coverage and underinsured motorist coverage in the amount of
 sixty thousand dollars ($60,000) per person and three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000) per incident from the moment a passenger enters the vehicle of a participating driver until the passenger exits the vehicle. The policy provided in this paragraph shall be primary over any other applicable uninsured or underinsured motorist coverage and shall be solely the obligation of the transportation network company. 

(3) The insurer, in the case of insurance coverage provided under this subdivision, shall have the duty to defend and indemnify the insured.

(4) A transportation network company may meet its obligations under
 paragraph (1) through a policy obtained by a participating driver pursuant to subparagraph (A) or (C) of paragraph (1) only if the transportation network company verifies that the policy is maintained by the driver and is specifically written to cover the driver’s use of a vehicle in connection with a transportation network company’s online-enabled application or platform.

(c) The following requirements shall apply to transportation network company insurance from the moment a participating driver logs on to the transportation network company’s online-enabled application or platform until the driver accepts a request to transport a passenger, and from the moment the driver completes the transaction on the online-enabled application or platform or the ride is complete, whichever is later, until the driver either accepts another ride request on the online-enabled application or platform or logs off the online-enabled application or platform:

(1) Transportation network company insurance shall be primary and in the amount of at least fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) for death and personal injury per person, one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) for death and personal injury per incident, and thirty thousand dollars ($30,000) for property damage. The requirements for the coverage required by this paragraph may be satisfied by any of the following:

(A) Transportation network company insurance maintained by a participating driver.

(B) Transportation network company insurance maintained by a transportation network company that provides coverage in the event a participating driver’s insurance policy under subparagraph (A) has ceased to exist or has been canceled, or the participating driver does not otherwise maintain transportation network company insurance
 pursuant to this subdivision.

(C) Any combination of subparagraphs (A) and (B).

(2) A transportation network company shall also maintain insurance coverage that provides excess coverage insuring the transportation network company and the driver in the amount of at least two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) per occurrence to cover any liability arising from a participating driver using a vehicle in connection with a transportation network company’s online-enabled application or platform within the time periods specified in this subdivision, which liability exceeds the required coverage limits in paragraph (1).

(3) The insurer providing insurance coverage under this subdivision shall be the only insurer having the duty to defend any liability claim arising from an accident occurring within the time periods specified
 in this subdivision.

(4) A transportation network company may meet its obligations under this subdivision through a policy obtained by a participating driver pursuant to subparagraph (A) or (C) of paragraph (1) only if the transportation network company verifies that the policy is maintained by the driver and is specifically written to cover the driver’s use of a vehicle in connection with a transportation network company’s online-enabled application or platform.

(d) Coverage under a transportation network company insurance policy shall not be dependent on a personal automobile insurance policy first denying a claim nor shall a personal automobile insurance policy be required to first deny a claim.

(e) In every instance where transportation network company insurance maintained by a participating driver to fulfill the
 insurance obligations of this section has lapsed or ceased to exist, the transportation network company shall provide the coverage required by this section beginning with the first dollar of a claim.

(f) This article does not limit the liability of a transportation network company arising out of an automobile accident involving a participating driver in any action for damages against a transportation network company for an amount above the required insurance coverage.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 314, Sec. 3.   (SB 371)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

5434.

(a) Nothing in this section shall be construed to require a private passenger automobile insurance policy to provide primary or excess coverage during the period of time from the moment a participating driver in a transportation network company logs on to the transportation network company’s online-enabled application or platform until the driver logs off the online-enabled application or platform or the passenger exits the vehicle, whichever is later.

(b) During the period of time from the moment a participating driver in a transportation network company logs on to the transportation network company’s online-enabled application or platform until the driver logs off the online-enabled application or platform or the passenger exits the vehicle, whichever is later, all of the following shall apply:

(1) The participating driver’s or the vehicle owner’s personal automobile insurance policy shall not provide any coverage to the participating driver, vehicle owner, or any third party, unless the policy expressly provides for that coverage during the period of time to which this subdivision is applicable, with or without a separate charge, or the policy contains an amendment or endorsement to provide that coverage, for which a separately stated premium is charged.

(2) The
 participating driver’s or the vehicle owner’s personal automobile insurance policy shall not have the duty to defend or indemnify for the driver’s activities in connection with the transportation network company, unless the policy expressly provides otherwise for the period of time to which this subdivision is applicable, with or without a separate charge, or the policy contains an amendment or endorsement to provide that coverage, for which a separately stated premium is charged.

(c) Notwithstanding any other law, a personal automobile insurer may, at its discretion, offer an automobile liability insurance policy, or an amendment or endorsement to an existing policy, that covers a private passenger vehicle, station wagon type vehicle, sport utility vehicle, or similar type of vehicle with a passenger capacity of eight persons or less, including the driver, while used in connection with a transportation network company’s online-enabled
 application or platform only if the policy expressly provides for the coverage during the time period specified in subdivision (b), with or without a separate charge, or the policy contains an amendment or an endorsement to provide that coverage, for which a separately stated premium may be charged.

(d) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2015.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 389, Sec. 1.   (AB 2293)   Effective January 1, 2015.   Section operative July 1, 2015, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

5435.

In a claims coverage investigation, a transportation network company or its insurer shall cooperate with insurers that are involved in the claims coverage investigation to facilitate the exchange of information, including the provision of dates and times at which an accident occurred that involved a participating driver and the precise times that the participating driver logged on and off the transportation network company’s online-enabled application or platform.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 389, Sec. 1.   (AB 2293)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

5436.

(a) The commission shall provide the following information in its annual report submitted on or before February 1, 2026, pursuant to Section 910:

(1) The average annual number of automobile accidents involving a participating driver using a personal vehicle reported to the commission for the years 2022 to 2024, inclusive, by transportation network companies.

(2) The average annual percentage of those automobile accidents reported to the commission resulting in uninsured motorist or underinsured motorist claims, or both, for the years 2022 to 2024, inclusive.

(3) The average annual percentage of those automobile accidents reported to the commission resulting in uninsured motorist or underinsured motorist claims, or both, over $100,000 for the years 2022 to 2024, inclusive.

(b) (1) In the annual report submitted on or before February 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 910, the commission shall specify the average transportation network company rider fare, excluding tips, tolls, and taxes, paid during the following time periods:

(A) July 1, 2025, to December 31, 2025, inclusive.

(B) January 1, 2026, to June 30, 2026, inclusive.

(C) July 1, 2026, to
 December 31, 2026, inclusive.

(2) The information required pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be published by the commission as an aggregate number across all transportation network companies for each time period as reported by transportation network companies.

(c) The commission shall not provide the information described in
 subdivisions (a) and (b) separately for each transportation network company, and nothing in
 subdivisions (a) and (b) shall affect the confidentiality of data submitted to the commission by transportation network companies.

(d) Pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, this section is inoperative on February 1, 2031, and, as of January 1,
 2032,
 is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 314, Sec. 4.   (SB 371)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Inoperative February 1, 2031, by its own provisions.   Repealed as of January 1, 2032, by its own provisions)
-------------------------------------------

5437.

A transportation network company shall not disclose to a third party any personally identifiable information of a transportation network company passenger unless one of the following applies:

(1) The customer knowingly consents.

(2) Pursuant to a legal obligation.

(3) The disclosure is to the
 commission in order to investigate a complaint filed with the commission against a transportation network company or a participating driver and the commission treats the information under confidentiality protections.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 389, Sec. 1.   (AB 2293)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

5438.

It is the intent of the Legislature that the Department of Insurance expedite review of any application for approval of transportation network company insurance products, and that these products become available for purchase on or before July 1, 2015.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 389, Sec. 1.   (AB 2293)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

5439.

Transportation network company insurance that meets the requirements of Section 5433 shall be deemed to satisfy the financial responsibility requirements of Sections 16054 and 16056 of the Vehicle Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 389, Sec. 1.   (AB 2293)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

5440.

The Legislature makes the following findings and declarations:

(a) The commission has initiated regulation of transportation network companies as a new category of charter-party carriers and continues to develop appropriate regulations for this new service.

(b) Given the rapidly evolving transportation network company service, it is the intent of the Legislature to continue ongoing oversight of the commission’s regulation of these services in order to enact legislation to adjust commission authority and impose specific requirements or prohibitions as deemed necessary as these services evolve.

(c) It is the intent of the Legislature that the commission initiate regulation of charter-party carriers in accordance with Section 5440.5 to ensure that transportation network company services do not discriminate against persons with disabilities, including those who use nonfolding mobility devices.

(d) Technology application-based ride hailing services, such as those services provided by transportation network companies (TNC), have impacted the lives of many people by reducing transportation barriers that limited access to jobs, health care, and society. However, more can be done to enable increased access to on-demand
 transportation services for people with disabilities, especially for persons using nonfolding motorized wheelchairs.

(e) The availability of transportation services, especially on-demand transportation service, can improve economic
 competitiveness and quality of life. Many individuals fulfill their transportation needs through vehicle ownership, public transit, carpooling, or walking and biking. However, transportation network companies or other application-based ride hailing services enable alternative, on-demand access to transportation.

(f) There exists a lack of wheelchair accessible vehicles (WAVs) available via TNC online-enabled applications or platforms throughout California. In comparison
 to standard vehicles available via TNC technology applications, WAVs have higher purchase prices, higher operating and maintenance costs, higher fuel costs, and higher liability insurance, and require additional time to serve riders who use nonfolding motorized wheelchairs.

(g) It is the intent of the Legislature that California be a national leader in the deployment and adoption of on-demand transportation options for persons with disabilities.

(h) It is the policy of the state to encourage collaboration among stakeholders and to promote partnerships to harness the expertise and strengths of all to serve the public interest.

(i) The Legislature further finds that adoption of services in communities that were previously
 underserved may take time, and requires robust dialogue, educational outreach, and partnerships to build trust in the new services.

(j) It is the intent of the Legislature that wheelchair users who need WAVs have prompt access to TNC services, and for the commission to facilitate greater adoption of wheelchair accessible vehicles on transportation network companies’ online-enabled applications or platforms.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 701, Sec. 3.   (SB 1376)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

5440.5.

(a) As part of the regulation of transportation network companies (TNCs) referenced in subdivision (a) of Section 5440, the commission shall do all of the following:

(1) In a new or existing proceeding, establish a program relating to accessibility for persons with disabilities, including wheelchair users who need a wheelchair-accessible vehicle (WAV). This program shall include, but is not limited to, all of the following:

(A) By January 1, 2019, the commission shall begin conducting workshops with stakeholders, including California cities and counties, disability rights organizations, persons with disabilities, transportation
 and transit agencies, social service transportation providers, paratransit coordinating councils, and transportation network companies, in order to determine community WAV demand and WAV supply and to develop and provide recommendations regarding the establishment of geographic areas, criteria for Access Fund expenditures, and educational outreach objectives for programs for on-demand services and partnerships consistent with the requirements of this section. The workshops may also examine topics including, but not limited to, vehicle specifications, subsidies for wheelchair pickups, maintenance and fuel costs, designated pickup locations for drivers in locations where door-to-door service is not feasible, standards for trip requests, response times, and rider initiated cancellation, limiting of stranded users, integration of service into city and county transportation plans, or any necessary
 training or additional incentives for WAV drivers that results in a measurable impact on service availability, efficiency, and efficacy. The commission shall conduct a minimum of five workshops throughout the state.

(B) (i) The commission shall require each TNC, by July 1, 2019, to pay on a quarterly basis to the commission an amount equivalent to, at minimum, five cents ($0.05) for each TNC trip completed using the transportation network company’s online-enabled application or platform that originates in one of the geographic areas selected pursuant to subparagraph (D), except if the TNC meets the requirements of an exemption established by the commission pursuant to subparagraph (G). The commission may adjust the fee in each geographic area selected pursuant to subparagraph (D) to different levels based on the cost of
 providing adequate WAV service within the geographic area.

(ii) Each TNC shall charge its customers on each TNC trip completed the full amount of the per-trip fee established pursuant to this subparagraph, and remit the total amount of those fees charged to the commission each quarter. The commission shall authorize a TNC to offset against the amounts due pursuant to this subparagraph for a particular quarter the amounts spent by the TNC during that quarter to improve WAV service on its online-enabled application or platform for each geographic area and thereby reduce the amount required to be remitted to the commission. In order to offset amounts due pursuant to this subparagraph in a geographic area, the commission shall require a TNC, at a minimum, to demonstrate, in the geographic area, the presence and availability of drivers with
 WAVs on its online-enabled application or platform, improved level of service, including reasonable response times, due to those investments for WAV service compared to the previous quarter, efforts undertaken to publicize and promote available WAV services to disability communities, and a full accounting of funds expended.

(C) The commission shall create the TNC Access for All Fund (Access Fund) and deposit moneys collected pursuant to subparagraph (B) in the Access Fund. The commission shall distribute funds in the Access Fund on a competitive basis to access providers that establish on-demand transportation programs or partnerships to meet the needs of persons with disabilities, including wheelchair users who need a WAV, in the geographic areas selected pursuant to subparagraph (D).

(D) The commission shall select geographic areas, which shall be based on the demand for WAVs within the area and selected according to outcomes of workshops in subparagraph (A), for inclusion in the on-demand transportation programs or partnerships funded pursuant to subparagraph (C). The commission shall allocate moneys in the Access Fund for use in each geographic area in a manner that is proportional to the percent of the Access Fund fees originating in that geographic area.

(E) The commission shall request access providers to submit applications to receive funds pursuant to subparagraph (C) by April 1, 2020. The commission may accept applications for new on-demand transportation programs or partnerships any time after April 1, 2020. From the applications that are submitted, the commission shall select by July 1, 2020,
 on-demand transportation programs or partnerships to receive funding based on criteria adopted by the commission in consultation with stakeholders described in subparagraph (A). As part of the criteria, the commission shall require an access provider to demonstrate in its application, at a minimum, how the program or partnership improves response times for WAV service compared to the previous year, the presence and availability of WAVs within the geographic area, and efforts undertaken to publicize and promote available WAV services to disability communities.

(F) The commission shall distribute funds pursuant to subparagraph (E) in the Access Fund within 90 days following the end of each year. If no access provider meets the requirements, funds shall remain in the Access Fund and be distributed the next year.

(G) The commission shall require each transportation network company to be accessible to persons with disabilities in order to be exempt from paying the charge required pursuant to subparagraph (B). The commission shall adopt a designated level of WAV service that is required to be met in each geographic area via a TNC’s online-enabled application or platform in order for the TNC to be exempt from paying the fee required pursuant to subparagraph (B) for the next year in that geographic area. As part of the designated level of WAV service for each geographic area, the commission shall require a TNC, at a minimum, to have response times for 80 percent of WAV trips requested via the TNC’s online-enabled application or platform within a time established by the commission for that geographic area. If a TNC meets the WAV service level
 requirement established pursuant to this subparagraph in a geographic area selected pursuant to subparagraph (D) for a particular year, the TNC shall be exempt from paying the fee imposed pursuant to subparagraph (B) for the next year for that geographic area only. A TNC may provide a higher level of service than the minimum service level requirement designated by the commission.

(H) A TNC may meet the requirements of clause (ii) of subparagraph (B) and subparagraph (G) by facilitating WAV service through its online-enabled application or platform, by directly providing WAV service with vehicles that it owns, or by a contract to provide WAV service with a transportation provider, or by any combination of these methods.

(I) Within 30 days after the end of each quarter, a
 transportation network company that receives an offset pursuant to clause (ii) of subparagraph (B) or an access provider that receives funding pursuant to subparagraph (C) shall submit a report to the commission. The report shall include, but shall not be limited to, all of the following:

(i) The number of WAV rides requested.

(ii) The number of WAV rides fulfilled.

(iii) Data detailing the response time between when a WAV ride was requested and when the vehicle arrived.

(iv) Information regarding educational outreach to disability communities, including, but not limited to, information and promotion of availability of WAVs for wheelchair users.
